apertium-bak.bak.twol
Alphabet

 А Б В Г Ғ Д Ҙ Е Ё Ж З И Й К Ҡ Л М Н Ң О Ө П Р С Ҫ Т У Ү Ф Х Һ Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ә Ю Я 
 а б в г ғ д ҙ е ё ж з и й к ҡ л м н ң о ө п р с ҫ т у ү ф х һ ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ә ю я

 %{A%}:а %{I%}:ы %{E%}:а %{U%}:у

 %{L%}:л %{G%}:г %{N%}:н %{K%}:к

 %{h%}:һ %{n%}:н %{l%}:л %{j%}:0

 %{т%}:0 %{д%}:0 %{ъ%}:0 %{ь%}:0

 %{е%}:ы %{ger%}:0 %{j%}:0 

 %{np%}:0 %>:0 

 !!! These are needed for the phonology of numbers, alphabetisms, and acronyms
 !!! They trigger relevant phonology and disappear
 %{а%}:0 %{э%}:0
 %{й%}:0 %{л%}:0 %{н%}:0 %{з%}:0 %{с%}:0 
 !!! And this is for Russian nouns
 %{☭%}:0 ;


Sets

SurVow           =  А О Ә Е Э И Ө У Ү Ы Ю Я
                    а о ә е э и ө у ү ы ю я  ; 

Vow              =  А О Ә Е Э И Ө У Ү Ы Ю Я
                    а о ә е э и ө у ү ы ю я 
                  %{E%} %{A%} %{I%} ;

BackVow          =  А О Ы У Ю Я
                    а о ы у ю я ; 

FrontVow         =  Ә Е Э И Ө Ү
                    ә е э и ө ү ; 

! FrontRoundVow    =  Ө   ! These names are ridiculous, but I redid it anyway
!                     ө ; 
! 
! BackRoundVow     =  О 
!                     о ; 

Cns              =  Б В Г Ғ Д Ҙ Ж З Й К Ҡ Л М Н Ң П Р С Ҫ Т Ф Х Һ Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ь 
                    б в г ғ д ҙ ж з й к ҡ л м н ң п р с ҫ т ф х һ ц ч ш щ ъ ь ; 

CnsVoiceless     =  П Т К Ҡ Ф Ҫ С Ш Щ Х Һ Б Г Ғ Д Ц Ч В
                    п т к ҡ ф ҫ с ш щ х һ б г ғ д ц ч в ; 

CnsVcdConts      =  Й Р Ҙ      ! Voiced Continuants
                    й р ҙ ;

CnsVcdNonConts   =  Л М Н Ң Ж З    ! Voiced Non-Continuants
                    л м н ң ж з ;

Nasals           =  М Н Ң 
                    м н ң ; 

FrontCns         =  К Г Ь
                    к г ь ;

BackCns          =  Ҡ Ғ  
                    ҡ ғ ; 

Rules 


"{E} turns to й after a vowel"
%{E%}:й <=> :SurVow %>: _ ;

!!!! Vowel Harmony !!!!
"A Vowel Harmony"
%{A%}:ә <=> [ :FrontVow :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | %  | [ :0 - [ %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: ] ] ] _ ;

"I Vowel Harmony"
%{I%}:Vy <=> [ :PreviousVow :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | %  | [ :0 - [ %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: ] ] ] _ ;
                                               [ %{ь%}:0 :Cns* ]/[ [ :0 - %{ь%}:0 ] ] _ ;
             except
                                      %{n%}:н/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;
             where          Vy in ( о е е е е ө е )
                   PreviousVow in ( о ә е э и ө ү )
             matched;

! "I Vowel Harmony (о)"
! %{I%}:о <=> [ :BackRoundVow :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | %  | :0 ] _ ;
! 
! "I Vowel Harmony (ө)"
! %{I%}:ө <=> [ :FrontRoundVow :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | %  | :0 ] _ ;

"E Vowel Harmony"
%{E%}:ә <=> [ :FrontVow :Cns* ]/[ %>: | %  | :0 ] _ ;
    except
         :SurVow %>: _ ;

"U Vowel Harmony"
!%{U%}:ү <=> [ :FrontVow :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | %  | :0 ] _ ;
%{U%}:ү <=> [ :FrontVow :Cns* [ :Cns | %{ger%}: ] ]/[ %>: | %  | :0 ] _ ;


"Deletion of {I} after vowels"
%{I%}:0 <=> [ :SurVow ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;
            except
         [ :SurVow :у ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;


"Deletion of {A} after vowels"
%{A%}:0 <=> [ :SurVow ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;
            except 
            %{j%}:/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;


!!!! Desonorisation !!!!

"L desonorisation after continuants"
%{L%}:ҙ <=> [ :CnsVcdConts ]/[ %>: | :0 | %  ] _ ;

"N desonorisation after continuants"
%{N%}:ҙ <=> [ :CnsVcdConts ]/[ %>: | :0 | %  ] _ ;
            except
                               %{n%}: %>: _ %{I%}: .#. ;

"L desonorisation after non-continuants"
%{L%}:д <=> [ :CnsVcdNonConts ]/[ %>: | :0 | %  ] _ ;

!@ р е с у р с {ъ}:0 >:0 {L}:т {A}:а р >:0 {h}:0 {I}:ы {n}:0 >:0 {N}:н {I}:ы ң

"N desonorisation after non-continuants"
%{N%}:д <=> [ :CnsVcdNonConts ]/[ %>: | :0 | %  ] _ ;
            except
                                  %{n%}: %>: _ %{I%}: .#. ;

!!!! Special archiphonemes !!!!

"Deletion of {h} after a consonant"
%{h%}:0 <=> [ :Cns ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
      [ :SurVow :у ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;

"Deletion of accusative {N} after {n}"
%{N%}:0 <=> %{n%}: %>: _ %{I%}: .#. ;

!"Deletion of {n} before genitive {N}s"
!%{n%}:0 <=> _ %>: %{N%}: %{I%}: \[ .#. ]  ;
!
!"Deletion of {n} before ablative {N}"
!%{n%}:0 <=> _ %>: %{N%}: %{A%}: :н ;

"Deletion of {n} before any {N} except accusative"
%{n%}:0 <=> _ %>: %{N%}: ;
            except
            _ %>: %{N%}: %{I%}: .#. ;

"Deletion of {I} after {n}"
%{I%}:0 <=> %{n%}:н/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;

"/n/ deletion in px3 nominative"
%{n%}:0 <=> _ .#. ;

"Deletion of dative {G} after px1sg, px2sg"
%{G%}:0 <=>  %{I%}: :Nasals %>: _ %{A%}: .#. ;


!!!! Voicing assimilation, etc. !!!!

"Intervocalic voicing of к/ҡ"
Cx:Cy <=> :Vow (:0) _ %>: (:0) :Vow ;
          where Cx in ( п к ҡ )
                Cy in ( б г ғ )
                matched;


! "N desonorisation after voiceless consonants"
! %{N%}:т <=> [ :CnsVoiceless ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
!             except
!                                 %{n%}: %>: _ %{I%}: .#. ;

"Forward voicing assimilation"
Cx:Cy <=> :CnsVoiceless/[ %>: | :0 | %  ] _ ;
          where Cx in ( %{M%}  %{L%}  %{N%} )
                Cy in (   п      т      т   )
                matched;

"Back assimilation of G"
%{G%}:ғ <=> [ :BackVow :Cns* ]/[ %>: | :0 | :и | :у ] _ ;
            except
     :CnsVoiceless/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
         :FrontCns/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
                    !:Nasals %>: _ %{A%}: .#. ;

"Voicing assimilation of back G"
%{G%}:ҡ <=> [ :BackVow :Cns* [ :CnsVoiceless - :FrontCns ] ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;

"Voicing assimilation of front G"
%{G%}:к <=> [ :FrontVow :Cns* [ :CnsVoiceless - :BackCns ] ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
!                               [ :CnsVoiceless & :FrontCns ]/[ %>: ] _ ;

"Passive {l} becomes n after verb stem ending in /l/ or /r/"
%{l%}:н <=> [ л :SurVow ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;
            [ р :SurVow ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;

"Voicing assimilation of back K"
%{K%}:ҡ <=> [ :BackVow ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ; 

"{т} surfaces before vowels"
%{т%}:т <=> _ :Vow/[ %>: | :0 ] ;

"{д} surfaces before vowels"
%{д%}:д <=> _ :Vow/[ %>: | :0 ] ;

"Convert {A} to я after BackVow and й or {j}"
%{A%}:я <=> [  :BackVow [ %{j%}: | й: ] ]/[ %>: | %  | :0 ] _ ;

"Convert {A} to йә after FrontVow and й or {j}"
%{A%}:йә <=> [  :FrontVow [ %{j%}: | й: ] ]/[ %>: | %  | :0 ] _ ;

"Convert {e} to e"
%{е%}:е <=> [ :FrontVow :Cns* :Cns ]/%>: _ ;

"Rule for the penultimate vowel in gerunds"
%{ger%}:Vy <=> [ :PreviousVow :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | %  | :0 ] _ ;
             where          Vy in ( о ө е е е е е ы ы ы ы ы)
                   PreviousVow in ( о ө ә е э и ү а у ы я ю) 
             matched;

"Soft sign deletion before suffixes"
ь:0 <=> _ (:0) %>: [ :Vow | :Cns ]/[ :0 | %>: ] ;

"т deletion in ст before suffixes"
ст:с%{ъ%} <=> _ (:0) %>: [ :Vow | :Cns ]/[ :0 | %>: ] ;
         except
                  _ %{np%}:/:0 %>: [ :Vow | :Cns ]/[ :0 | %>: ] ;

"ть deletion in сть before suffixes"
сть:с%{ъ%} <=> _ (:0) %>: [ :Vow | :Cns ]/[ :0 | %>: ] ;
         except
                  _ %{np%}:/:0 %>: [ :Vow | :Cns ]/[ :0 | %>: ] ;

"т deletion in вт before suffixes"
вт:в%{ъ%} <=> _ (:0) %>: [ :Vow | :Cns ]/[ :0 | %>: ] ;
         except
                  _ %{np%}:/:0 %>: [ :Vow | :Cns ]/[ :0 | %>: ] ;

"д deletion in зд before suffixes"
зд:з%{ъ%} <=> _ (:0) %>: [ :Vow | :Cns ]/[ :0 | %>: ] ;
         except
                  _ %{np%}:/:0 %>: [ :Vow | :Cns ]/[ :0 | %>: ] ;
